Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Operation and Powers

7-57-301. Powers of authority.

An authority shall constitute a public body and a body corporate and politic, exercising public powers, and having all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the powers to:

Investigate hospital, medical and health conditions and into the means and methods of improving such conditions;

Study and make recommendations concerning the plan of any city or municipality located within its boundaries in relation to the provision of adequate hospital, medical and nursing facilities;

Prepare, carry out and operate hospital projects;

Provide and operate outpatient departments, maternity clinics, decentralized primary health care facilities, and any other clinics customarily operated in or by hospitals in metropolitan centers;

Provide the clinical setting for the teaching and instruction programs of schools for medical students, interns and physicians; and provide teaching and instruction programs for nurses, and all other medical or paramedical personnel;

Provide and maintain continuous resident physician, intern and other medical services;

Establish rates, fees, charges and other compensation to be paid by patients for any services rendered in its hospital facilities;

Participate in any governmental programs, such as medicare and medicaid, and obtain reimbursement under medicare and medicaid for services rendered to patients;

Appoint all administrative, professional, technical and other employees; appoint legal counsel and an auditor; enter into contracts of employment with such employees and appointees and fix their compensation and terms of employment, subject to the budget controls of the creating and participating municipalities; and remove such employees or appointees;

Enter into agreements with the creating municipality and participating municipalities with respect to the manner of transfer of hospital employees of such municipalities to the authority and with respect to the retention by such employees of existing civil service status and accrued pension, disability, hospitalization, death, or other fringe benefits;

Enter into a plan for pension, disability, hospitalization and death benefits for the officers and employees of the authority, either by contract with the creating municipality and participating municipalities, or otherwise;

Adopt necessary rules and regulations for the governance of the authority and its employees, and appoint such committees or subcommittees as it shall deem advisable, and fix their duties and responsibilities;

Subject to the provisions for letting of public contracts as provided in the charter or governing law of the creating municipality, enter into contracts for necessary supplies, equipment or services incident to the operation of its business;

Do all things necessary in connection with the construction, repair, reconstruction, management, supervision, and control of its operation and facilities, including, but not limited to, the hospital and all departments of the hospital;

Accept donations of money, personal property or real estate for the benefit of the authority and take title to the donations from any person, firm, corporation or society desiring to make such donations;

Determine and regulate the conditions under which the privilege of practicing within any hospital operated by the authority may be available to physicians, and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations governing the conduct of physicians and nurses while on duty in the hospital;

Make rules and regulations governing the admission of patients to, and the care, conduct, and treatment of patients in, the hospital;

Determine whether and to what extent patients presented to the hospital for treatment are subjects for financial subsidy because of their income level, family size or other established criteria;

Maintain and operate isolation wards for the care and treatment of mental, contagious or other similar diseases;

Provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration or repair of any hospital project or any part of a hospital project, subject to the budget limitations that may be imposed by the creating municipality or any participating municipality;

Act as agent for the federal government in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation or management of a hospital project, or any part of a hospital project;

Arrange with any city or municipality located in whole or in part within its boundaries or with a government for the planning, replanning, furnishing, installing, opening or closing of streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, other places or facilities and utilities, or for the acquisition by such city, municipality, or a government of property options or property rights or for the furnishing of property or services in connection with a project;

Arrange with the state, its subdivisions and agencies, and any county, city or municipality of the state, to the extent that it is within the scope of each of their respective functions:

Cause the services customarily provided by each of them to be rendered for the benefit of such hospital authority; and

Lease or rent any of the dwellings or other accommodations or any of the lands, buildings, structures or facilities embraced in any hospital project and establish and revise the rents or charges for the lease or rental;

Purchase, lease, improve, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise any personal property, or any interest in personal property from any person, firm, corporation, city, municipality, or government, for any of the purposes provided for in this chapter;

Sell, exchange, transfer, assign, or pledge any personal property, or any interest in personal property to any person, firm, corporation, municipality, city, or government;

Self-insure or provide for the insurance of the property or operations of the authority against such risks as the authority may deem advisable;

In connection with any loan by a government, agree to limitations upon the exercise of any powers conferred upon the authority by this chapter;

Invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds, or any temporarily excess funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which trustees, guardians, executors, administrators, and others acting in a fiduciary capacity may legally invest funds subject to their control;

Sue and be sued;

Have a seal and alter the seal;

Have perpetual succession; and

Make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-4009.

Cross-References. Federal and state grants and contracts, powers, §7-57-310.

7-57-302. Exercise of powers through agents — Corporate agents.

An authority may exercise any or all of the powers conferred upon it in this chapter, either generally or with respect to any specific hospital project or projects, through or by an agent or agents that it may designate, including any corporation or corporations that are or shall be formed under the laws of this state, and for such purposes an authority may cause one (1) or more corporations to be formed under the laws of this state or may acquire the capital stock of any corporation or corporations. Any corporate agent, all of the stock of which shall be owned by the authority or its nominee or nominees, may, to the extent permitted by law, exercise any of the powers conferred upon the authority in this chapter.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-4010.

7-57-303. Implied powers — Limitations.

In addition to all of the other powers conferred upon it in this chapter, an authority may do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this part. No authority shall have or exercise any governmental powers or authority other than those specifically granted in this chapter. No authority shall have any taxing powers, any right or authority to pledge, encumber or obligate the general credit of any of its creating or participating municipalities for its bonds or debts, nor any power of eminent domain or condemnation.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-4011.

7-57-304. Additional powers.

With the approval of the governing bodies of the creating and participating municipalities, the authority has the following additional powers, to:

Issue its bonds and notes in the manner provided in the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21, and secure the same by pledges of its revenues;

Enter into a plan for civil service for employees of the authority, either by contract with the creating municipality and participating municipalities, or otherwise;

Take over by contract, purchase, lease or otherwise any hospital project located within its boundaries undertaken by any government, or by any city or municipality located in whole or in part within its boundaries;

Purchase, lease, improve, obtain options upon, acquire any real property, or any interest in real property from any person, firm, corporation, city, municipality, or government, for any of the purposes provided for in this chapter; and

Sell, exchange, transfer, assign, or pledge any real property, or any interest in real property to any person, firm, corporation, municipality, city, or government.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-4012; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 36.

Attorney General Opinions. County hospital board of trustees' authority to sell hospital, OAG 98-0119 (7/2/98).

7-57-305. Acquisition and transfer of real property interests.

Any creating or participating municipality may acquire any interest in land within the boundaries of the creating or participating municipality by gift, purchase, lease or condemnation, and may transfer such interest to an authority by sale, lease or gift. Such transfer may be authorized by resolution of the governing body of the municipality without submission of the question to the voters and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations, or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 10; T.C.A., § 6-4013.

7-57-306. Zoning and building laws.

All hospital projects and facilities of an authority shall be subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary, safety and building laws, ordinances, resolutions and regulations applicable to the locality in which the hospital project or any of its facilities are situated.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 11; T.C.A., § 6-4014.

7-57-307. Tax exemption — Exceptions — Tax equivalents.

The authority shall be exempt from the payment of any taxes or fees to the state or any subdivisions of the state, or to any officer or employee of the state or any subdivision of the state, except as provided in this section. The property of an authority shall be exempt from all county and municipal taxes, and for the purposes of such tax exemption, it is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that an authority is and shall be deemed to be a municipal corporation; provided, that the authority shall pay all county and municipal fees. An authority may, however, agree to the payment of tax equivalents to the creating or participating municipalities, as provided in §7-57-201(g).

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 12; T.C.A., § 6-4015.

Cross-References. Certain hospital authorities to pay tax equivalents on realty leased for commercial purposes, §67-9-201.

7-57-308. Powers of creating or participating municipalities.

Any creating municipality and any participating municipality has all necessary powers in order to further the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following, any or all of which powers may be exercised by ordinance or resolution of its governing body:

The governing body of any creating or participating municipality in which the authority is located may appropriate each year such sums from its general fund as the governing body deems to be necessary for the construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of any public hospital or hospital project or other facility constructed, maintained or operated by an authority, and money so appropriated and paid to a hospital authority shall be deemed a necessary expense of such creating or participating municipality. The governing body of any such creating or participating municipality shall also be authorized to advance or lend money, or real or personal property, to the authority for use in carrying out its purposes as set forth in this chapter;

The governing body of any creating or participating municipality in which the authority is located may appropriate each year such sums from its capital funds as the governing body deems to be necessary for the purchase, construction, expansion, or improvement of any public hospital or hospital project or other facility constructed, maintained or operated by an authority, and money so appropriated and paid to a hospital authority shall be deemed a necessary expense of such creating or participating municipality. The governing body of any such creating or participating municipality shall also be authorized to advance or lend money, or real or personal property, to the authority for use in carrying out its purposes as set forth in this chapter;

The governing body of any creating or participating municipality may borrow money against its general credit on such terms and for such period as it shall deem appropriate and sell revenue or general obligation bonds and advance, lend, grant, donate or appropriate the funds to the authority for the construction or improvement of any hospital project or other facility constructed, maintained or operated by the authority;

The governing body of any creating or participating municipality may borrow money against its general credit on such terms and for such period as it shall deem appropriate and advance, lend, grant, donate or appropriate the funds to the authority for the maintenance and operation of any hospital project or other facility constructed, maintained or operated by the authority;

To provide that any funds on hand or made available to it for hospital purposes shall be paid directly to the authority;

To cause water, sewer, gas, electric or other utility services to be provided to the hospital authority;

To sell, lease, dedicate, donate or otherwise convey to the authority any of its interest in any existing hospital or other related property, either real or personal, or grant easements, licenses or other rights or privileges in the existing hospital or other related property to the authority;

To open and improve streets, roads and alleys to the hospitals;

To provide police and fire protection services to the hospitals; and

To enter into agreements with the authority with regard to the transfer of its hospital employees to the authority with the retention by such employees of any civil service status and accrued rights in pension, disability, hospitalization and death, and other fringe benefits.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 13; T.C.A., § 6-4016.

7-57-309. Operation of property.

Any property, real or personal, conveyed or leased to an authority by a creating or participating municipality shall be operated by the authority to which the property is conveyed, together with other facilities of the authority, in accordance with and under this chapter and the contracts entered into between the authority and the governing body or bodies of the creating or participating municipality or municipalities.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 14; T.C.A., § 6-4017.

7-57-310. Borrowing — Federal and state grants and contracts.

In addition to the powers conferred upon authorities by other provisions of this chapter, authorities are also empowered to:

Borrow money or accept grants from the federal or state governments for or in aid of the construction of any hospital project that such authority is authorized by this chapter to undertake;

Take over any land acquired by the federal or state governments for the construction of a hospital project, with the approval of the governing bodies of the creating and participating municipalities;

Take over, lease or manage any hospital project constructed or owned by the federal or state government; and

Enter into such contracts, mortgages, trust indentures, leases or other agreements that the federal or state government shall have the right to supervise and approve the construction, maintenance and operation of such hospital project.

It is the purpose and intent of this chapter to authorize every authority to do any and all things necessary to secure the financial aid and the cooperation of the federal and state governments in the construction, maintenance and operation of any hospital project that the authority is empowered by this chapter to undertake.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 19; T.C.A., § 6-4022.